v1.1/old/guesser.lexc
LEXICON VerbEte

[Quant_Qual][4Sg]-ete:~f-wmete** EncliticOrEnd;

! ---------------------------------------------------------|
!              Localis Case + -ete- Contractions           |
! -----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------|
!                   singular possessed                     |                        plural possessed                 |                          dual possessed                       |
! -----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
[Loc][Unpd][Sg]-ete:~f-wmete**                 VerbMoodInfl; [Loc][Unpd][Pl]-ete:~f-w/-wnite**           VerbMoodInfl; [Loc][Unpd][Du]-ete:~sf-w%:(e)gnite**             VerbMoodInfl; ! unpossessed   |
! ---------------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
[Loc][3SgPoss][SgPosd]-ete:~%:(ng₁)anite**     VerbMoodInfl; [Loc][3SgPoss][PlPosd]-ete:~%:(ng₁)anite**  VerbMoodInfl; [Loc][3SgPoss][DuPosd]-ete:~sf-w%:(e)gkenite**    VerbMoodInfl; ! 3Sg possessor |
[Loc][3PlPoss][SgPosd]-ete:~%:(ng₁)itnite**    VerbMoodInfl; [Loc][3PlPoss][PlPosd]-ete:~%:(ng₁)itnite** VerbMoodInfl; [Loc][3PlPoss][DuPosd]-ete:~%:(ng₁)itnite**       VerbMoodInfl; ! 3Pl possessor |
[Loc][3DuPoss][SgPosd]-ete:~sf-w%:(e)gkenite** VerbMoodInfl; [Loc][3DuPoss][PlPosd]-ete:~%:(ng₁)itnite** VerbMoodInfl; [Loc][3DuPoss][DuPosd]-ete:~%:(ng₁)itnite**       VerbMoodInfl; ! 3Du possessor |
! ---------------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
[Loc][1SgPoss][SgPosd]-ete:–mnite**            VerbMoodInfl; [Loc][1SgPoss][PlPosd]-ete:–mnite**         VerbMoodInfl; [Loc][1SgPoss][DuPosd]-ete:~sf-w%:(e)gemnite**    VerbMoodInfl; ! 1Sg possessor |
[Loc][1PlPoss][SgPosd]-ete:–mnnite**           VerbMoodInfl; [Loc][1PlPoss][PlPosd]-ete:–mnnite**        VerbMoodInfl; [Loc][1PlPoss][DuPosd]-ete:~sf-w%:(e)gemnnite**   VerbMoodInfl; ! 1Pl possessor |
[Loc][1DuPoss][SgPosd]-ete:–mtegnite**         VerbMoodInfl; [Loc][1DuPoss][PlPosd]-ete:–mtegnite**      VerbMoodInfl; [Loc][1DuPoss][DuPosd]-ete:~sf-w%:(e)gemtegnite** VerbMoodInfl; ! 1Du possessor |
! ---------------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
[Loc][2SgPoss][SgPosd]-ete:–gpenite**          VerbMoodInfl; [Loc][2SgPoss][PlPosd]-ete:–gpenite**       VerbMoodInfl; [Loc][2SgPoss][DuPosd]-ete:~sf-w%:(e)gpenite**    VerbMoodInfl; ! 2Sg possessor |
[Loc][2PlPoss][SgPosd]-ete:–gpesinite**        VerbMoodInfl; [Loc][2PlPoss][PlPosd]-ete:–gpesinite**     VerbMoodInfl; [Loc][2PlPoss][DuPosd]-ete:~sf-w%:(e)gpesinite**  VerbMoodInfl; ! 2Pl possessor |
[Loc][2DuPoss][SgPosd]-ete:–gpetegnite**       VerbMoodInfl; [Loc][2DuPoss][PlPosd]-ete:–gpetegnite**    VerbMoodInfl; [Loc][2DuPoss][DuPosd]-ete:~sf-w%:(e)gpetegnite** VerbMoodInfl; ! 2Du possessor |
! ---------------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
![Loc][4SgPoss][SgPosd]-ete:~f-wminite**       VerbMoodInfl; [Loc][4SgPoss][PlPosd]-ete:~f-wminite**     VerbMoodInfl; [Loc][4SgPoss][DuPosd]-ete:~sf-w%:(e)gminite**    VerbMoodInfl; ! 4Sg possessor |
[Loc][4PlPoss][SgPosd]-ete:~f-wmeggnite**      VerbMoodInfl; [Loc][4PlPoss][PlPosd]-ete:~f-wmeggnite**   VerbMoodInfl; [Loc][4PlPoss][DuPosd]-ete:~sf-w%:(e)gmeggnite**  VerbMoodInfl; ! 4Sg possessor |
[Loc][4DuPoss][SgPosd]-ete:~f-wmegnite**       VerbMoodInfl; [Loc][4DuPoss][PlPosd]-ete:~f-wmegnite**    VerbMoodInfl; [Loc][4DuPoss][DuPosd]-ete:~sf-w%:(e)gmegnite**   VerbMoodInfl; ! 4Pl possessor |
[Loc][4DuPoss][SgPosd]-ete:~f-wmegtenite**     VerbMoodInfl; [Loc][4DuPoss][PlPosd]-ete:~f-wmegtenite**  VerbMoodInfl; [Loc][4DuPoss][DuPosd]-ete:~sf-w%:(e)gmegtenite** VerbMoodInfl; ! 4Du possessor |
! ---------------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|




!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!                                                                 !!!!!!
!!!!!!     Inflectional Morphemes Applied To Verbs / Derived Bases     !!!!!!
!!!!!!                                                                 !!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VerbMoodInfl

!-nayuka[Vol_of_Fear]@R.VALENCE@:nayuka@R.VALENCE@  EncliticOrEnd;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                                  !!!
!!!     Independent Mood Markers     !!!
!!!                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

@R.VALENCE.INTR@[V][Intr][Ind]:@R.VALENCE.INTR@~f(g/t)u                     IntransitiveIndicativeFutureOptative;
@R.VALENCE.TRNS@[V][Trns][Ind]:@R.VALENCE.TRNS@~(g)a                        TransitiveIndicative; 

@R.VALENCE.INTR@[V][Intr][Ptcp]:@R.VALENCE.INTR@@₁–lghii/@*ngugh*           IntransitiveParticipial;
@R.VALENCE.TRNS@[V][Trns][Ptcp]:@R.VALENCE.TRNS@@~–(g)ke                    TransitiveParticipialFutureOptative; 

@R.VALENCE.INTR@[V][Intr][Intrg]:@R.VALENCE.INTR@                           IntransitiveInterrogative; 
@R.VALENCE.TRNS@[V][Trns][Intrg]:@R.VALENCE.TRNS@                           TransitiveInterrogative; 

@R.VALENCE.INTR@[V][Intr][Opt][PRS]:@R.VALENCE.INTR@                        IntransitivePresentOptative;
@R.VALENCE.TRNS@[V][Trns][Opt][PRS]:@R.VALENCE.TRNS@                        TransitivePresentOptative;

@R.VALENCE.INTR@[V][Intr][Opt][NEG]:@R.VALENCE.INTR@–fqaa                   IntransitiveNegativeOptative;
@R.VALENCE.TRNS@[V][Trns][Opt][NEG]:@R.VALENCE.TRNS@                        TransitiveNegativeOptative;

@R.VALENCE.INTR@[V][Intr][Opt][FUT]:@R.VALENCE.INTR@[Opt_FUT_Intr]          IntransitiveIndicativeFutureOptative;
@R.VALENCE.TRNS@[V][Trns][Opt][FUT]:@R.VALENCE.TRNS@@₁~fna@~–(g)ke          TransitiveParticipialFutureOptative;

@R.VALENCE.INTR@[V][Intr][Opt][FUT][NEG]:@R.VALENCE.INTR@@₁~fyaquna         IntransitiveNegativeFutureOptative;
@R.VALENCE.TRNS@[V][Trns][Opt][FUT][NEG]:@R.VALENCE.TRNS@@₁~fyaquna         TransitiveNegativeFutureOptative;

@R.VALENCE.INTR@[V][Intr][Ptcp_Obl]:@R.VALENCE.INTR@@₁~fyalghii             IntransitiveParticipialOblique;
@R.VALENCE.TRNS@[V][Trns][Ptcp_Obl]:@R.VALENCE.TRNS@@₁~fyaqe                TransitiveParticipialOblique;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                                 !!!
!!!     Connective Mood Markers     !!!
!!!                                 !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

@R.VALENCE.INTR@[V][Intr][Prec]:@R.VALENCE.INTR@@₁~fvagilga      IntransitivePrecessiveConsequential;
@R.VALENCE.TRNS@[V][Trns][Prec]:@R.VALENCE.TRNS@@₁~fvagilga      TransitivePrecessiveConsequential;

@R.VALENCE.INTR@[V][Intr][CnsqI]:@R.VALENCE.INTR@@₁~fy/~f(ng₁)a  IntransitivePrecessiveConsequential;
@R.VALENCE.TRNS@[V][Trns][CnsqI]:@R.VALENCE.TRNS@@₁~fy/~f(ng₁)a  TransitivePrecessiveConsequential;

@R.VALENCE.INTR@[V][Intr][CnsqII]:@R.VALENCE.INTR@~(g)aqnga      IntransitivePrecessiveConsequential; 
@R.VALENCE.TRNS@[V][Trns][CnsqII]:@R.VALENCE.TRNS@~(g)aqnga      IntransitivePrecessiveConsequential; 

@R.VALENCE.INTR@[V][Intr][Conc]:@R.VALENCE.INTR@–ghnga           IntransitiveConcessive;
@R.VALENCE.TRNS@[V][Trns][Conc]:@R.VALENCE.TRNS@–ghnga           TransitiveConcessive;

@R.VALENCE.INTR@[V][Intr][Ctmp]:@R.VALENCE.INTR@@₁~f–negh        IntransitiveContemporative; ! TODO: Is ~f involved?
@R.VALENCE.INTR@[V][Intr][Ctmp]:@R.VALENCE.INTR@@₁~f–ngh         IntransitiveContemporative;
@R.VALENCE.TRNS@[V][Trns][Ctmp]:@R.VALENCE.TRNS@@₁~f–negh        TransitiveContemporative;
@R.VALENCE.TRNS@[V][Trns][Ctmp]:@R.VALENCE.TRNS@@₁~f–ngh         TransitiveContemporative;

@R.VALENCE.INTR@[V][Intr][Cond]:@R.VALENCE.INTR@@~–(g)ka[Cond]   IntransitiveConditional;
@R.VALENCE.TRNS@[V][Trns][Cond]:@R.VALENCE.TRNS@@~–(g)ka[Cond]   TransitiveConditional;

@R.VALENCE.INTR@[V][Intr][Sbrd]:@R.VALENCE.INTR@@₁~flu/na        IntransitiveSubordinative;
@R.VALENCE.TRNS@[V][Trns][Sbrd]:@R.VALENCE.TRNS@@₁~flu/na        TransitiveSubordinative;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                                    !!!
!!!      Person-Number Inflection      !!!
!!!                                    !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON IntransitiveIndicativeFutureOptative
!---------------------|--------------------------|-------------------------|
[3Sg]:q  EncliticOrEnd; [1Sg]:nga   EncliticOrEnd; [2Sg]:ten  EncliticOrEnd;
[3Pl]:t  EncliticOrEnd; [1Pl]:kut   EncliticOrEnd; [2Pl]:si   EncliticOrEnd;
[3Du]:k  EncliticOrEnd; [1Du]:kung  EncliticOrEnd; [2Du]:tek  EncliticOrEnd;
!---------------------|--------------------------|-------------------------|

LEXICON IntransitiveParticipial
!---------------------|--------------------------|-------------------------|
[3Sg]:0  EncliticOrEnd; [1Sg]:nga   EncliticOrEnd; [2Sg]:ten  EncliticOrEnd;
[3Pl]:t  EncliticOrEnd; [1Pl]:kut   EncliticOrEnd; [2Pl]:si   EncliticOrEnd;
[3Du]:k  EncliticOrEnd; [1Du]:kung  EncliticOrEnd; [2Du]:tek  EncliticOrEnd;
!---------------------|--------------------------|-------------------------|
